Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.310.270

ESD superintendent's powers and duties—Chief executive officer.

In addition to other powers and duties as provided by law, each educational service district superintendent shall:

(1) Serve as chief executive officer of the educational service district and secretary of the educational service district board.

(2) Visit the schools in the educational service district, counsel with directors and staff, and assist in every possible way to advance the educational interest in the educational service district.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 24; 1974 ex.s. c 75 s 13; 1972 ex.s. c 3 s 1; 1971 ex.s. c 282 s 17; 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 11. Formerly RCW 28A.21.110, 28.19.550.]

NOTES:

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 75: See note following RCW 28A.310.030.

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 282: See note following RCW 28A.310.010.

Severability—Rights preserved—1969 ex.s. c 176: See notes following RCW 28A.310.010.